Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-33-101. Power to issue bonds to pay improvement costs.

When the legislative body shall have ordered the construction of any improvement in accordance with the terms of chapter 32 of this title, the legislative body shall have the power, for the purpose of providing means to pay that portion of the cost of the improvement not chargeable to the municipality proper, to issue negotiable bonds of the municipality pursuant to the Local Government Public Obligations Law, compiled in title 9, chapter 21 to the amount in par value not exceeding two thirds (2/3) of the estimated cost of any such improvement or improvements, which cost shall, for this purpose, be estimated by the legislative body in the ordinance authorizing the issue of the bonds.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 9; Shan., § 1991a37; Code 1932, § 3444; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1201; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 14.

Cross-References. Bonds for improvements based on assessed values of benefited properties, title 7, ch. 33, part 3.

Borrowing authorized for improvements by special assessment, §7-32-140.

Limitation on actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

Provisions of chapter supplemental, §7-32-141.

Special assessments, title 7, ch. 32.

7-33-102 — 7-33-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§7-33-102 —7-33-113 (Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 9; 1921 Private, ch. 526, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 3445-3451, 3454-3460; Shan., §§ 1991a38-1991a44, 1991a47-1991a53; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-1202 — 6-1213), concerning general provisions of improvement bonds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 15.

7-33-114. Assessments set aside for payment of bonds.

The legislative body of the municipality shall provide by ordinance that the assessments levied upon the property abutting on the streets, alleys, or highways, or part or parts of the streets, alleys, or highways, in respect of which any such bonds are issued, shall be set apart as a fund for the payment of such bonds and interest.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 9; Shan., § 1991a45; Code 1932, § 3452; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1214.

7-33-115. Tax levy to meet payments not met by assessments.

It is the duty of the legislative body of the municipality to levy an ad valorem tax upon all of the taxable property in the municipality to pay the principal and interest of the bonds as they become due, or to pay such part or parts of the principal and interest of the bonds as are not provided for by the assessments levied and actually collected and in the treasury of the municipality set apart for the payment of such bonds and interest.

Such tax shall be in addition to all other taxes that such municipality is by law authorized to levy.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 9; Shan., § 1991a46; Code 1932, § 3453; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1215.

7-33-116. Legislative provisions to assure funds for payment.

In the event of the issuance of bonds as in this part and part 2 of this chapter provided, it is the duty of the legislative body of the municipality to ascertain, in due season in advance of the time for the payment of the principal or interest, or both, of any and all such bonds, and in advance of the time for the payment of principal or interest, or both, of any such bonds, whether or not there is or will be sufficient moneys provided by the assessments levied and actually collected and in the treasury of the municipality set apart for the payment of the principal and interest of such bonds as the same from time to time become due.

It is the duty of the legislative body of the municipality, in due season in advance, to levy an ad valorem tax upon all the taxable property in the municipality sufficient to pay the principal and interest of such bonds as they become due from time to time, or to pay such part or parts of the principal and interest of the bonds as are not or will not be fully provided for by the assessments levied and actually collected and in the treasury of the municipality in season for the payment of the principal and interest of such bonds as the same, from time to time, become due.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 10; Shan., § 1991a54; Code 1932, § 3461; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1216.

7-33-117. Collection of assessments notwithstanding tax levy.

In case the municipality levies and collects ad valorem taxes for the purpose of paying the principal and interest of any bonds, or any part of the principal and interest of the bonds, the municipality shall, nevertheless, have the power and authority to proceed with the levy and collection of assessments. Such assessments, or part of the assessments, sufficient for the purpose, shall be paid into the treasury of the municipality to reimburse the treasury for the amount thus paid out of such ad valorem taxes. Such money thus reimbursed to the treasury shall be used, under the direction of the legislative body of the municipality, for any lawful corporate purpose for which ad valorem taxes may legally be levied and collected.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 10; Shan., § 1991a55; Code 1932, § 3462; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1217.

7-33-118. Assessments and bonds unaffected by irregularities.

Any failure on the part of any municipality to comply with any of the provisions of this part and part 2 of this chapter or chapter 32 of this title, and any failure in the existence or performance of any of the conditions precedent to the issuance of any bonds under such provisions, shall not affect the validity of such bonds or of the assessment made under the provisions, but shall be in all respects valid and binding.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 11; Shan., § 1991a56; Code 1932, § 3463; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1218.

7-33-119. Assessments pledged for payment of bonds.

The proceeds arising from the collection of assessments levied for improvements authorized by this part and part 2 of this chapter and chapter 32 of this title shall be and constitute a separate and distinct fund. Such fund, together with its accumulations, is hereby pledged for the payment of the bonds and interest coupons issued for the improvement or improvements from the assessments of which the fund arises, and shall be applied exclusively to the payment of the bonds and coupons.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 12; Shan., § 1991a57; Code 1932, § 3464; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1219.

7-33-120. Segregation and deposit of assessment collections.

All proceeds arising from the collection of assessments levied for such improvements shall, as soon as collected, be deposited by the city treasurer in some bank to be designated by the legislative body of the municipality. Such collections shall not be deposited with the general funds of the city, but shall be considered a separate deposit to the account of “Public Improvement,” and shall be drawn out on checks or orders directing the amount designated in the checks or orders to be paid out of the “Public Improvement” funds.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 12; Shan., § 1991a58; Code 1932, § 3465; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1220.

7-33-121. Issuance of revenue bonds.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, a municipality may issue revenue bonds in the manner provided in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, including part 3, or enter into a loan agreement pursuant to the Public Building Authorities Act of 1971, compiled in title 12, chapter 10, with a public building authority to finance all costs and expenses permitted to be assessed pursuant to § 7-32-115(b) and/or refund or refinance bonds or other obligations of the municipality that temporarily financed such costs and expenses. In such cases, all assessments received pursuant to chapter 32 of this title by the municipality shall be deemed revenues for purposes of the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986 or shall be deemed revenues of a project for purposes of the Public Building Authorities Act of 1971. In such cases, the revenue bonds or loan agreement may be, but are not required to be, additionally secured by the full faith and credit of the municipality, in the manner provided in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986 or the Public Building Authorities Act of 1971 for the incurrence of indebtedness by the municipality that is secured by the full faith and credit of the municipality.

Any municipality is also authorized to delegate to any industrial development corporation incorporated by the municipality or any other municipality in which the public facility is located the authority to issue the revenue bonds, in which case the municipality shall enter into an agreement with the industrial development corporation pursuant to which the municipality shall agree to promptly pay to the industrial development corporation the assessments including any interest on the assessments, as collected. The assessments shall be held in trust by the municipality for the benefit of the industrial development corporation when received. The municipality may direct any property owner that is required to pay assessments to make the payments directly to an industrial development corporation or its assignee. If an industrial development corporation issues such bonds, assessments imposed pursuant to chapter 32 of this title, and any interest collected on the assessments constitutes revenues, as defined in § 7-53-101, and public facilities and related expenses described in § 7-32-101(d), whether transferred to the industrial development corporation on behalf of the municipality or to the municipality itself, shall constitute a project as defined in § 7-53-101.

Any municipality is authorized to delegate to an industrial development corporation the authority to acquire a public facility on behalf of the municipality in the manner described in § 7-32-101(d). All bonds issued by industrial development corporations pursuant to this section shall be issued in accordance with chapter 53 of this title.

Any municipality is also authorized to delegate to any public building authority the authority to issue the revenue bonds, in which case the municipality shall enter into an agreement with the public building authority pursuant to which the municipality shall agree to promptly pay to the public building authority the assessments, including any interest on the assessments, as collected and the assessments shall be held in trust by the municipality for the benefit of the public building authority when received. The municipality may direct any property owner that is required to pay assessments to make the payments directly to a public building authority or its assignee. If a public building authority issues the bonds, assessments imposed pursuant to chapter 32 of this title, and any interest collected on the assessments shall constitute revenues, as defined in § 12-10-103, and public facilities and related expenses described in this chapter, whether transferred to the public building authority on behalf of the municipality or to the municipality itself shall constitute a project, as defined in § 12-10-103.

Any municipality is authorized to delegate to a public building authority the authority to acquire an improvement described as a public facility on behalf of the municipality. All bonds issued by public building authorities pursuant to this section shall be issued in accordance with the Public Building Authorities Act of 1971.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the issuance of any bonds or other obligations by any public entity acting pursuant to this chapter, the public entity shall give notice of the proposed issuance of the bonds or other obligations to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and shall also provide the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee with a copy of the ordinance or resolution authorizing the bonds or other obligations.

A municipality is authorized to refund or refinance or otherwise cause the refunding or refinancing of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this section in the manner provided in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, the Public Building Authorities Act of 1971, or chapter 53 of this title, as applicable. Without limiting this subsection (e), a municipality may refund or refinance any bonds or loan agreements secured by the full faith and credit of the municipality and revenues received from assessments with bonds or a loan agreement secured only by such revenues. Upon any such refunding, the amount of assessment payments may be adjusted pursuant to policies approved by the municipality; provided, that the amount of the assessment as adjusted does not exceed the maximum costs assessed by the municipality.

For purposes of calculating the applicable formula rate under § 47-14-103 and the related provisions of title 47, chapter 14 to determine the maximum effective rate applicable to bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter by any municipality or other public entity, the language “four (4) percentage points above the average prime loan rate” in the definition of formula rate in § 47-14-102 shall be replaced with the language “seven (7) percentage points above the average prime loan rate”. This subsection (f) shall apply to bonds or other obligations issued on or before June 30, 2012.

Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 11; 2009, ch. 489, §§ 7, 8; 2010, ch. 868, § 16; 2010, ch. 958, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§7-33-121 —7-33-124 (Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, §§ 12, 13, 22; Code 1932, §§ 3466-3468, 3490; Shan., §§ 1991a59-1991a61, 1991a83; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-1221 — 6-1223, 6-1235), concerning general provisions of improvement bonds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 15.

Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 9 provided that the act, which amended §§7-32-101,7-32-115,7-32-129,7-32-133,7-32-138 and7-33-121, shall apply to all agreements and assessments entered into or imposed pursuant to7-32-101(d) and7-32-115(b) on or after July 1, 2007.